North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 12. Food, Drugs and Cosmetics.
§ 106-140.
Further powers of Commissioner of Agriculture for enforcement of Article; report by inspector to owner of establishment.

For purposes of enforcement of this Article, the Commissioner or any of his authorized agents, are authorized upon presenting appropriate credentials and a written notice to the owner, operator or agent in charge,

To enter at reasonable times any factory, warehouse or establishment in which food, drugs, devices or cosmetics are manufactured, processed, or packed or held for introduction into commerce or after such introduction or to enter any vehicle being used to transport or hold such food, drugs, devices or cosmetics in commerce; and

To inspect at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner such factory, warehouse, establishment or vehicle and all pertinent equipment, finished or unfinished materials, containers and labeling therein, and to obtain samples necessary to the endorsement of this Article. In the case of any factory, warehouse, establishment, or consulting laboratory in which any food, drug, device or cosmetic is manufactured, processed, analyzed, packed or held, the inspection shall extend to all things therein (including records, files, papers, processes, controls and facilities) bearing on whether any food, drug, device or cosmetic which is adulterated or misbranded within the meaning of this Article or which may not be manufactured, introduced into commerce or sold or offered for sale by reason of any provision of this Article, has been or is being manufactured, processed, packed, transported or held in any such place or otherwise bearing on violation of this Article. No inspection authorized by the preceding sentence shall extend to

Financial data,

Sales data other than shipment data,

Personnel data (other than data as to qualifications of technical and professional personnel performing functions subject to this Article),

Pricing data, and

Research data (other than data relating to new drugs and antibiotic drugs, subject to reporting and inspection under lawful regulations issued pursuant to section 505(i) or (j) or section 507 (d) or (g) of the federal act, and data, relating to other drugs, which in the case of a new drug would be subject to reporting or inspection under lawful regulations issued pursuant to section 505(j) of the federal act).

Such inspection shall be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness. The provisions of the second sentence of this subsection shall not apply to such classes of persons as the Board may by regulation exempt from the application of this section upon a finding that inspection as applied to such classes of persons in accordance with this section is not necessary for the protection of the public health.

To have access to and to copy all records of carriers in commerce showing the movement in commerce of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic, or the holding thereof during or after such movement, and the quantity, shipper and consignee thereof: Provided, that evidence obtained under this subsection shall not be used in a criminal prosecution of the person from whom obtained; and provided further, that carriers shall not be subject to the other provisions of this Article by reason of their receipt, carriage, holding, or delivery of food, drugs, devices or cosmetics in the usual course of business as carriers.

Upon completion of any such inspection of a factory, warehouse, consulting laboratory or other establishment and prior to leaving the premises, the authorized agent making the inspection shall give to the owner, operator, or agent-in-charge a report in writing setting forth any conditions or practices observed by him which in his judgment indicate that any food, drug, device or cosmetic in such establishment:

Consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance; or

Has been prepared, packed or held under insanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health.

If the authorized agent making any such inspection of a factory, warehouse or other establishment has obtained any salable product samples in the course of the inspection, upon completion of the inspection and prior to leaving the premises he shall offer reasonable payment for any such product samples.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner of Agriculture to make or cause to be made examination of samples secured under the provisions of this section to determine whether or not any provision of this Article is being violated.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 21; 1975, c. 614, s. 38.

§ 106-140.1.
Registration of producers of prescription drugs and devices.

On or before December 31 of each year, every person doing business in North Carolina and operating as a wholesaler, manufacturer, outsourcing facility, or repackager, as those terms are defined in subsection (j) of this section, shall register with the Commissioner his name and business location(s) in North Carolina. If said person has no business locations in North Carolina, he shall register his name and location of his corporate offices.

Every person, upon first operating as a wholesaler, manufacturer, outsourcing facility, or repackager in North Carolina shall immediately register with the Commissioner his name, place of business, and such establishment. If said person has no business locations in North Carolina, he shall register his name and location of his corporate offices.

Every person duly registered in accordance with subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall register with the Commissioner any additional establishment that he owns or operates in the State of North Carolina prior to doing business as a manufacturer, wholesaler, outsourcing facility, or repackager.

The Commissioner may assign a registration number to any person or any establishment registered in accordance with this section.

The Commissioner shall make available for inspection to any person so requesting any registration filed pursuant to this section.

The following classes of people are exempt from the registration requirements of this section:

Pharmacists as defined in G.S. 90-85.3(q) holding a valid permit as defined in G.S. 90-85.3(m).

Practitioners licensed or registered by law to prescribe or administer drugs and who manufacture, prepare, compound, or process drugs or devices solely for use in the course of their professional practice.

Persons who manufacture, prepare, compound, or process drugs solely for use in research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

Other classes of persons the Commissioner may by rule exempt from the application of this section upon a finding that registration by these classes of persons in accordance with this section is not necessary for the protection of the public health.

Wholesale distributors of prescription drugs licensed under

G.S. 106-145.3

.

Every establishment in the State of North Carolina registered with the Commissioner pursuant to this section shall be subject to inspection pursuant to

G.S. 106-140

.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules to implement the registration requirements of this section. These rules shall provide for an annual registration fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for companies operating as manufacturers, outsourcing facilities, or repackagers and seven hundred dollars ($700.00) for companies operating as wholesalers. The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall use these funds for the implementation of the North Carolina Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.

For the purposes of this act, name means the name of the partnership if a partnership and the name of the corporation if a corporation.

As used in this section:

The term “manufacturer” means a person who prepares, derives, or produces a prescription drug. Pharmacists are specifically excluded from this definition if they are acting in the course of their professional practice as defined in Chapter 90 and rules adopted pursuant to it.

(1a)

The term “outsourcing facility” means a manufacturer at a single geographic location or address that is engaged in the compounding of sterile drugs, has elected to register as an outsourcing facility with the Food and Drug Administration, and complies with the requirements as provided in 21 U.S.C. § 353b. Exemptions provided by 21 U.S.C. § 353b(a) with respect to labeling, new drug registration, and distribution supply chain requirements shall also apply to compounded drugs distributed in North Carolina by an outsourcing facility.

The term “prescription drug” means a drug that under federal law is required, prior to being dispensed or delivered, to be labeled with the following statement: “Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without a prescription.”

The term “repackager” means a person who repacks, relabels, or manipulates a prescription drug which was in a unit packaged and sealed by a manufacturer. Pharmacists are specifically exempted from this definition if they are acting in the course of their professional practice as defined in Chapter 90 and rules adopted pursuant to it.

The term “wholesaler” means a person acting as a jobber, wholesale merchant, salvager, or broker, or agent thereof, who sells or distributes for resale a prescription drug. Pharmacists are specifically exempted from this definition if they are acting in the course of their professional practice as defined in Chapter 90 and rules adopted pursuant to it.

History.

1987, c. 737, s. 2; 1989, c. 226, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 20; 1991, c. 699, ss. 3, 4; 1997-261, s. 109; 2015-241, s. 13.4(a); 2015-263, s. 32; 2015-268, s. 5.1.

§ 106-141.
Examinations and investigations.

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 614, s. 39.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized to conduct the examinations and investigations for the purposes of this Article through officers and employees of the Department or through any health, food or drug officer or employee of the State, or any political subdivision thereof: Provided, that when examinations and investigations are to be conducted through any officer or employee of any agency other than the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services the arrangements for such examinations and investigations shall be approved by the directing head of such agency.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized to delegate embargo authority concerning food and drink pursuant to

G.S. 106-125

to the Secretary of Health and Human Services and to local health directors.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 22; 1975, c. 614, s. 39; 1983, c. 891, s. 12; 1997-261, s. 109; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 106-141.1.
Inspections of donated food.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is authorized to inspect for compliance with the provisions of Article 12 of Chapter 106 of the North Carolina General Statutes, food items donated for use or distribution by nonprofit organizations or nonprofit corporations, and may establish procedures for the handling of the food items, including reporting procedures concerning the donation of food.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may apply to Superior Court for injunctive relief restraining the violation of this section.

Nothing in this section shall limit the duties or responsibilities of the Commission for Public Health or the local boards of health.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1188, s. 3; 1997-261, s. 34; 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” in subsection (c).

§ 106-142.
Publication of reports of judgments, decrees, etc.

The Commissioner of Agriculture may cause to be published from time to time reports summarizing all judgments, decrees, and court orders which have been rendered under this Article, including the nature of the charge and the disposition thereof.

The Commissioner of Agriculture may also cause to be disseminated such information regarding food, drugs, devices, and cosmetics as he deems necessary in the interest of public health and the protection of the consumer against fraud. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the Commissioner of Agriculture from collecting, reporting, and illustrating the results of the investigations of the Department.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 23.

§ 106-143.
Article construed supplementary.

Nothing in this Article shall be construed as in any way amending, abridging, or otherwise affecting the validity of any law or ordinance relating to the Commission for Public Health or the Department of Environmental Quality or any local health department in their sanitary work in connection with public and private water supplies, sewerage, meat, or other foods, or food products, or the production, handling, or processing of these items.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 241/2; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 19, s. 31; 1997-443, s. 11A.41; 2007-182, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 13.3(u); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

§ 106-144.
Exemptions.

Meats and meat products subject to the Federal Meat Inspection Act of March 4, 1907 (34 Stat. 1260), as amended and extended (21 U.S.C. 71 et seq.), and poultry and poultry products subject to the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act (21 U.S.C. 451 et seq.) are exempted from the provisions of this Article so long as such meat, meat products, poultry, and poultry products remain in the possession of the processor.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 242/3; 1975, c. 614, s. 40.

§ 106-145.
Effective date.

This Article shall be in full force and effect from and after January 1, 1940: Provided, that the provisions of

G.S. 106-139

shall become effective on April 3, 1939, and thereafter the Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized hereby to conduct hearings, and the Board is authorized to promulgate regulations which shall become effective on and after the effective date of this Article as the Board shall direct.

History.

1939, c. 320, s. 25.